District of Columbia statutes.
33-439

Repealed

Dissolution — Order of distribution of assets; liabilities; contribution of partners to satisfy liabilities; rights of assignees; partner’s right to enforce contributions; distribution of claims against separate property.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 646, Pub. L. 87-709, § 40
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-139.
1973 Ed., § 41-339.